Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 58 Adult Education Commission [Repealed.]

16-58-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 94, § 1; effective June 13, 2006.

16-58-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 35; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 35; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 94, § 1; effective June 13, 2006.

16-58-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 209, § 1; 1999, ch. 105, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 94, § 1; effective June 13, 2006.

16-58-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 94, § 1; effective June 13, 2006.

16-58-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 94, § 1; effective June 13, 2006.

16-58-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 94, § 1; effective June 13, 2006.

16-58-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 94, § 1; effective June 13, 2006.

16-58-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 94, § 1; effective June 13, 2006.

16-58-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 94, § 1; effective June 13, 2006.

16-58-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 94, § 1; effective June 13, 2006.

16-58-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 94, § 1; effective June 13, 2006.

16-58-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 94, § 1; effective June 13, 2006.

16-58-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 94, § 1; effective June 13, 2006.